Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 40 Control of Contagious Diseases
2-40-1201. Fees — Disposition of funds.

In order to fund or partially fund the pseudorabies control and eradication program there is hereby levied a fee of one dollar ($1.00) per head on all spent sows and boars sold at livestock markets.

Each livestock market operator shall collect fees and remit monthly to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.

The secretary may promulgate such rules as the secretary deems necessary to implement the collection of the fee.

After deducting three percent (3%) for credit to the Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund, the remainder of funds so remitted to the secretary shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues and credited to the Livestock and Poultry Commission Swine Testing Fund.

Before the close of each fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine the amount of funds which will remain at the end of the fiscal year in the fund from fees collected under the provisions of this section. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall allow such funds to be carried forward and made available for the same purpose in the next-succeeding fiscal year.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b)(1); substituted “secretary may promulgate such rules as the secretary deems” for “director may promulgate such rules as it deems” in (b)(2); and substituted “secretary” for “director” in (c).

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-12 may not apply to this subchapter which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Am. Jur. 4 Am. Jur. 2d, Ani., § 23 et seq.

Ark. L. Rev.

Noble and Looney, The Emerging Legal Framework for Animal Agricultural Waste Management in Arkansas, 47 Ark. L. Rev. 159.

C.J.S. 3A C.J.S., Animals, § 232 et seq.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1105, § 24; 2019, No. 910, § 3298.

Subchapter 13

— Disposal of Large Animal Carcasses

2-40-1301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission created by § 2-33-101;

“Large animal” means cattle, horses, hogs, sheep, goats, cervidae, bison, llamas, alpacas, ostriches, emus, rheas, and other native or nonnative animals, excluding dogs and cats; and

“Large animal carcasses” means carcasses of large animals which died as the result of sickness, suffocation, accident, or from any cause other than intentional slaughter.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 522, § 1.

2-40-1302. Disposal.

All large animal carcasses and all parts of large animal carcasses shall be disposed of in a manner prescribed by rules of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission.

However, no large animal carcass shall be buried or otherwise disposed of in any landfill operated under a permit issued by the Division of Environmental Quality.

If a person or entity conducts a farming activity at more than one (1) location, it shall not be necessary for such person or entity to have a disposal ditch or facility at each location unless specified by the State Veterinarian.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(2).

History.

Acts 1993, No. 522, §§ 3, 4; 1999, No. 1164, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 2416.

2-40-1303. Violation.

A person who violates this subchapter shall be subject to an administrative penalty.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 522, § 2; 2017, No. 1011, § 76.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “A person who violates this subchapter shall be subject to an administrative penalty” for “Each violation of this subchapter by a responsible person shall constitute a Class A misdemeanor and shall be punishable accordingly”.

2-40-1304, 2-40-1305. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning regulations and responding to complaints, were repealed by Acts 2017, No. 1011, §§77, 78. The sections were derived from the following sources:

2-40-1304. Acts 1993, No. 522, §§ 5, 7.

2-40-102. Acts 1907, No. 409, § 1, p. 1043; C. & M. Dig., § 348; Pope's Dig., § 363; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-401.

2-40-109. Destruction of diseased poultry flocks.

2-40-205. Blood test training program.

Subchapter 4

— Disposal of Fowl Carcasses

2-40-502. Acts 1981, No. 271, §§ 1-3, 11; 1985, No. 150, § 6; 1985, No. 151, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-461 — 78-463; Acts 1995, No. 19, § 1; 1995, No. 142, § 1.

2-40-504. Acts 1981, No. 271, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-464.

2-40-506. Acts 1981, No. 271, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-466.

2-40-508. Legislative intent.

2-40-602. Acts 1957, No. 33, § 2; 1959, No. 124, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-434.

Subchapter 7

— Hog Cholera

2-40-702. Acts 1957, No. 154, §§ 1, 2; 1963, No. 248, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-448, 78-605, 78-606; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 25.

2-40-704. Acts 1963, No. 248, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-441.

2-40-706. Acts 1963, No. 248, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-443.

2-40-708. Acts 1963, No. 248, §§5, 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-445, 78-446.

2-40-802. Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1212, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-460; Acts 1987, No. 1007, § 6.

2-40-804. Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1212, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-458; Acts 1987, No. 1007, § 4.

2-40-802. Acts 1987, No. 374, § 4; 1987, No. 1034, § 2; 1991, No. 1155, § 1.

2-40-804. Acts 1987, No. 374, § 3.

2-40-828. [Repealed.]

2-40-902. Acts 1973, No. 306, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-452.

2-40-904. Acts 1951, No. 396, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-419.

2-40-906. Acts 1951, No. 396, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-420, 78-421.

2-40-1002. Acts 1895, No. 120, §§ 1-4, p. 176; C. & M. Dig., §§ 384-387; Pope's Dig., §§ 408-411; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-501 — 78-504; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 26.

2-40-1004. Acts 1899, No. 45, § 3, p. 71; 1907, No. 409, § 11, p. 1043; C. & M. Dig., §§ 358, 380; Pope's Dig., §§ 383, 404; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-508, 78-509; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 27.

2-40-1006. Acts 1907, No. 409, §§ 12-14, p. 1043; C. & M. Dig., §§ 359-361; Pope's Dig., §§ 384-386; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-511 — 78-513.

2-40-1305. Acts 1993, No. 522, § 6.